District of Columbia statutes.
8-406

Pesticide operators.

(a)

No person shall act in the capacity of a pesticide operator, or advertise as or assume to act as a pesticide operator at any time unless he is licensed by the Mayor in accordance with this subchapter and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

(b)

Application for a pesticide operator license shall be made in writing on a form prescribed by the Mayor. Each application shall contain information regarding the applicant’s proposed operations, license classification or classifications applied for, and shall include the following:

(1)

The full name of the person applying for the license;

(2)

The full name of each member of the firm or partnership, or the names of the principal officers of the association, corporation, or group, if the applicant is a person other than an individual;

(3)

The business address of the applicant;

(4)

A certificate of liability insurance as required by § 8-407;

(5)

Designation of those individuals who are certified and licensed in each category in which the business will engage; and

(6)

Such other information as the Mayor may prescribe.

(c)

(1)

No licensed pesticide operator (as defined in § 8-401(bb)(1) and (bb)(3) ) shall permit the use of any pesticide by any person who is not a licensed commercial or public applicator designated pursuant to § 8-406, or a registered employee of the pesticide operator acting under the direct supervision of the licensed applicator.

(2)

No licensed pesticide operator (as defined in § 8-401(bb)(2) ) shall permit the use of any restricted use pesticide by any person who is not a licensed commercial or public applicator designated pursuant to § 8-406(b)(5), or a registered employee of the pesticide operator acting under the direct supervision of the licensed applicator.

History

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 7, 24 DCR 6867

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-751.6.